Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [New plan for economic reform proposed by Academicians L. </F>
Abalkin, N. Petrakov, and S. Shatalin, in three parts: "While 
the Problems Are Becoming Worse in the Country, the Reforms Are 
Headed in the Wrong Direction"] 
<H5>  [4 Feb pp 4-5] </H5>
  [Text] 
<H5>  Once Again, The Results of "Shock Therapy" </H5>
  After 2 years (1992 and 1993), sufficient time has elapsed 
to 
review the "shock therapy" and assess its results. 
  In giving a positive assessment of the movement that was 
begun toward a market economy, we nevertheless must note the 
continuously increasing "price," excessive in many respects, 
which society has already paid and which it will be forced to 
pay for the strategy and tactics chosen for the transition to 
the market. 
  The scale of the current crisis, which has increased as 
the result of the "shock therapy" and its internal structure, is 
having an extremely harmful effect on the solution of social 
problems and is fraught with the irreversible destruction of the 
country's economic and scientific-technical potential. 
  In just the past 2 years, the production recession reached 
about 30 percent in the most important macroeconomic indicators, 
and compared with the level before the crisis, it came close to 
40 percent. At the same time, it is important to stress that the 
production recession is not structural but universal in nature, 
first of all, and secondly, the most advanced and 
high-technology sectors and forms of production have been 
affected to the greatest extent. 
  The "shock therapy" ideologists assess the consequences of 
the production recession very superficially; they consider it a 
matter that is temporary and easily redressed. To make it more 
convincing, they refer to historical experience, when the 
country regained its former strength in a relatively short 
period of time after tremendous destruction and losses (as the 
result of the Civil War and World War II). 
  The following must be mentioned in this regard: 
  First. Under current conditions, the loss of 
production volume is the loss of the market, and not just the 
world market (for example, in the aerospace industry, in arms 
production, and so forth), but the domestic market as well. Once 
a place in the market is given up, it is extremely difficult to 
regain it. 
  Second. Historical analogies are not persuasive in 
this case. The time when an economy could be restored with the 
help of a shovel and a hoe, by relying on mass enthusiasm or 
coercion of the population, has gone forever. This may be 
accomplished in the modern world only with the support of the 
latest equipment, technology, and production organization. 
Having lost this capability, the country is unavoidably doomed 
to lag behind for a protracted period, and perhaps permanently. 
  The socioeconomic consequences of the recession in 
investment activity are the most far-reaching and 
dangerous. In just the past 2 years, the volume of 
investments in the Russian economy declined by more than 
one-half, and today it is about 40 percent of the level before 
the crisis. 
  With a volume such as this, not only structural 
reorganization is impossible, but elementary production growth 
as well. But the problem is deeper and more complex. Even today 
the depreciation of fixed production capital has come close to 
60 percent, that is, to the threshold beyond which physical 
destruction of the country's production potential begins. The 
public has become a witness to the increasing danger of 
accidents and disasters. 
  The crisis which is under way has also affected the field of 
science (including basic and sectorial science, planning and 
design work, and experimental and prototype production). The 
first-rate and world-class collectives are being disintegrated 
before our eyes, the leadership in a number of fields of 
scientific and technical progress is being lost, and the 
physical base is becoming hopelessly obsolete. 
  The country is losing its intellectual potential, along with 
hopes for Russia's revival and prosperity. 
  The collapse of the financial system and the loss of 
control over the circulation of money--this is one of the 
consequences of the "shock therapy" policy and the methods of 
implementing it. We have not managed to normalize the 
budgetary system in 2 years, in spite of huge loans from the 
Central Bank to cover the deficit and the artificial withdrawals 
from the Pension Fund. The payments crisis resulting from 
actions that were insufficiently considered and the inability to 
provide for the normal receipt of taxes have only undermined the 
income base of the budget and made for a chronic deficit. 
  The government has made extensive use of the emission to 
fulfill its populist declarations and as a distinctive narcotic 
to "reassure" production. Over the past 2 years it has been the 
principal borrower of Central Bank funds. The cash emission 
increased from 1.5 trillion rubles [R] in 1992 to R10.1 trillion 
in 1993, and its proportion in the total money supply grew from 
24 to 37 percent. And practically all of the cash put into 
circulation over the past year has remained in the public's 
hands or is providing for the nonbanking turnover of resources. 
  The increase in inflation induced by the liberalization of 
prices has not ceased over the 2 years. The average monthly 
inflation rate in 1993 was even higher than in the preceding 
year (if the January "surge" in 1992 is excluded). The lack of 
success in the struggle against inflation can be attributed to 
misunderstanding of its nature in the Russian economy 
(underestimation of its highly monopolized structure, disregard 
for the cost inflation factor, and so forth), and accordingly by 
the choice of inadequate and purely monetary means to hold it in 
check by demand limitations. 
  The progress and results of privatization are far from 
ambiguous. The breakdown of total state control of the economy 
and the emergence of a growing number of quite energetic real 
property owners should be included among its pluses, first of 
all. The negative consequences, in many respects, stem from 
insufficient consideration of privatization itself and the haste 
to implement it. Administrative pressure and the monotony of 
forms of privatization were maintained (orientation exclusively 
toward the establishment of open joint-stock companies), and a 
reliable legal basis was not established. The ideologists of 
privatization proclaimed that the issuance of vouchers did not 
provide for its national nature, and that the real depreciation 
of the vouchers' value and their concentration in a small number 
of investment funds was fraught not only with further 
stratification of society, but an increase in social tension. 
  The concept of state refusal to regulate economic and 
social processes has turned into a general loss of 
controllability. World experience in state regulation, 
especially in countries with a socially oriented market economy, 
has been disregarded. The special role of the state inherent in 
transitional stages of social development has not been taken 
into account. 
  The results of carrying out a monetarist policy and the 
state's withdrawal from regulation of economic and social 
processes as an integral part of it have demonstrated the 
theoretical and practical unsoundness of the course chosen. 
  The exhaustion of social resources to continue the 
"shock therapy" is an alarming result of implementing this 
policy for 2 years. The decrease in public incomes by more 
than one-half and the sharp increase in their differentiation 
have exacerbated the social situation in the country. At 
present, the incomes of the 10 percent of the citizens who are 
most well-off are 10 times higher than the incomes of those who 
are the least well-off; one-third of the public have incomes 
below the official subsistence minimum, and 10 percent of the 
population, or about 15 million persons, are beyond the 
threshold of physical survival. This is a warning that the 
society is entering a zone of social conflicts. 
  It must be stressed that this is not simply a matter of 
quantitative indicators. Over the past 2 years there have been 
far-reaching qualitative changes and trends have developed which 
attest to the emergence of a threat to Russian society itself. A 
process of depopulation has begun, and the rising mortality rate 
is attributable to a large extent to alcoholism, murders, and 
suicides. There is a sharp increase of persons in a marginal 
status, and the number of poor, homeless, alcoholics, and drug 
addicts is rising. The quality of "human material" is declining 
at a very high rate (immunity to mass diseases is declining, and 
prostitution, venereal diseases, and births of children with 
deficiencies are on the increase). 
  The public's moral principles, social values and ideals, and 
personal and family hopes, which always have made it possible to 
survive temporary adversities are collapsing, it would appear. 
Crime is on the increase and becoming brazen and mafia groups 
are multiplying. The bribery, extortion, and embezzlement which 
are becoming widespread are not being met by an outcry and moral 
condemnation. 
  Everything which has been stated enables us to maintain that 
the social price paid by society for the "shock therapy" has 
exceeded the maximum permissible limits. 
  The scope of economic and social calamities which 
Russia has endured presents a real threat to its national 
security. The country has found itself at a dangerous 
threshold, and if it crosses the threshold, it risks losing the 
chance to restore itself as a great power forever. 
  This is the result of 2 years of the "shock therapy" policy. 
  The most radical reformers justify the disruptions and 
sacrifices in every possible way as the unavoidable costs of a 
fundamental change in the political, social, and economic 
systems that have taken shape and Russia's "return" among the 
civilized countries. The Economics Department of the RAN 
[Russian Academy of Sciences] and the International "Reforma" 
Fund, on the other hand, are convinced that: 
  --no objective, including a new version of the "bright 
future," can justify the social sacrifices which the Russian 
people have made and to which they are unavoidably doomed if the 
chosen course is continued. The different approach is immoral 
and inhumane; 
  --the society which really exists in Russia today is 
very remote from the models which exist in countries with a 
highly efficient and socially oriented market economy. To a 
greater extent, it is a society based on excessively developed 
property stratification, corruption, organized crime, and 
foreign dependence. From a socioeconomic viewpoint, this is not 
a step ahead, but the country's throwback to 2 centuries ago, to 
an era of primitive "uncivilized" capitalism; and 
  --any programs to bring Russia and its social and 
economic system up to date can count on success only if they 
take into account, together with world trends, its originality, 
the distinctive nature of its history and culture, the spiritual 
legacy of its people, and an appropriate system of values. 
Russia does not need to return to world civilization--it has 
always been part of it and is still part of it as a unique type 
of civilized system. 
  Analysis of the course of reform and the results of Russia's 
socioeconomic development over the past 2 years makes it 
possible to draw a number of conclusions. 
  First. The deep crisis and the social problems are 
not the result of the unresolved problems, individual 
miscalculations, or the opposition of conservative forces 
(although all this had a place), but the unavoidable consequence 
of the course of reforms chosen and the methods of implementing 
them. 
  The attempt to solve all the problems "in one leap," by a 
"cavalry charge" was dictated not by sober scientific 
calculation, but by impatience and political ambitions. Despite 
the assertions of its initiators, this policy has been and 
continues to be highly idealized and it is being implemented by 
neobolshevist methods. 
  Second. After seeing the collapse of their chosen 
course of economic policy from the first steps of its 
implementation, the initiators of "shock therapy" did not learn 
any lessons, but continued to stubbornly insist on its 
continuation. This only aggravated the situation even more and 
brought new hardships for the people. 
  In order to conceal their fiasco, the reformers in power 
proceeded to engage in systematic misinformation of the public 
and misrepresentation of the true situation in the economy and 
the life of the people. 
  Third. From the every beginning there has been an 
erroneous orientation toward the decisive role played by foreign 
aid, and domestic sources to stimulate business activity, 
especially investment activity, have not been put into action. 
It became clear rather quickly that this was a major strategic 
miscalculation. The meager amounts of this continuously promised 
aid cannot seriously affect the results of the reforms in Russia 
under any conditions. However, even after this no serious 
adjustments have been made in economic policy. 
  Fourth. The claim of infallibility and possession 
of absolute truth lies at the basis of many of the errors 
committed and the unwillingness to change the course of economic 
policy, even after its complete failure was revealed. Hence the 
unwillingness to listen to criticism and the depiction of this 
criticism as allegedly coming from "the enemies of reform." The 
notion that there is no alternative for the reform but the 
strategy and tactics for implementing it chosen by the authors 
of "shock therapy" are being stubbornly imposed on public 
opinion. 
  Fifth. The unprofessionalism of the initiators and 
champions of the "shock therapy" policy has become obvious by 
now. 
  The public has encountered a new variety of subjectivism and 
voluntarism in the development and implementation of economic 
policy and clearly expressed ideological attachments in the 
policy itself. 
  However, there was a qualitative turning point in the 
people's frame of mind at the end of 1993. In the December 
elections, the people spoke out decisively against the 
experiments associated with "shock therapy." Only about 8 
percent of the voters supported the "Russia's Choice" bloc, 
whose leaders are the ideologists and champions of this policy. 
Continuing this policy even further means acting against the 
clearly expressed will of the people. 
  The Economics Department of the Russian Academy of 
Sciences and the International "Reforma" Fund believe that in 
the name of restoring Russia as a great power it is essential to 
critically and honestly assess the results of the past 2 years 
and to work out a new strategy of social and economic 
reforms. 
<H5>  On a New Strategy for Social and Economic Reforms </H5>
  Selection of a strategy for socioeconomic reforms is one of 
the key questions of theoretical thought and political practice, 
and one of the most complicated ones as well. The problem of 
selection itself is based on recognition of the many variations 
and alternatives in social development. World and domestic 
experience has demonstrated the bankruptcy of notions about the 
unequivocal adherence to directions of social progress and about 
the existence of a certain "ideal model" of a socioeconomic 
system for all countries and peoples. 
  Choosing a strategy for socioeconomic reforms is a complex 
state and public process which requires not only thorough 
scientific study, but takes into account the will of the people 
and the consent of leading public and political forces and 
movements. 
  Certain basic principles in developing such a 
strategy: 
  First. Defining and formulating the social 
indicators of the reform: its objectives, as well as the limits 
which must not be crossed under any circumstances for any 
reasons (a guaranteed subsistence minimum, an employment 
threshold, a proportion of expenditures for education and public 
health in the GNP, and other factors). 
  Second. Rejecting naive faith in automatic 
normalization of the economy with the aid of depersonalized 
monetarism and restoring state regulation in its natural and 
generally accepted functions. The immediate steps, in our view, 
are as follows: 
  --shifting the emphasis to support for physical 
production and stimulation of business activity, including 
investment activity; 
  --working out an effective industrial policy, including 
a structural policy, to give the Russian economy an up-to-date 
appearance and increase the competitiveness of domestic products 
in the world and domestic markets; and 
  --ensuring the supreme authority of the law and 
developing well-reasoned and reliable economic legislation and 
stable "rules of the game," without which the subjects of a 
market economy cannot function successfully. 
  Third. Shifting to new principles for financial 
stabilization of the national economy based on elimination of 
disproportions between the material-substantive and 
financial-cost aspects of reproduction. 
  Fourth. Setting the objective of forming a single 
all-Russian market as a basis of the reform when the specific 
nature of the federative system in Russia is taken into account. 
This means shifting the center of gravity to local areas in 
implementing economic reform while the center retains the 
functions related to the formation and functioning of a unified 
market (development of unified "rules of the game," regulation 
of the circulation of money, common customs territory, and 
provision for the free movement of goods, financial resources, 
and manpower among the regions). 
  Fifth. Reexamining the role of foreign aid in 
reforming the Russian economy, using as a basis the strategy of 
orientation toward domestic scientific-technical and production 
potential and domestic sources of savings. This does not 
conflict with the course toward openness of the economy and 
Russia's limited participation in the world economy, but 
presupposes that it can and should basically resolve its own 
problems itself. 
  Sixth. A special role is played by the problem of 
changing property relationships. This is one of the principal 
directions for further development and expansion of the economic 
reform. The following are key approaches in the new strategy: 
  --overcoming the ownerless nature of property and 
finding a real, interested, and responsible owner for each of 
its forms (including the state form); 
  --gradual movement toward a modern, multistructured 
economy in which the most diverse forms of ownership are 
combined and supplement each other: private and state, 
cooperative and municipal, the property of public and religious 
organizations, foreign property, and the various joint forms of 
it; 
  --provision for an increase in efficiency and 
attraction of investments to expand production and modernize it 
should be among the chief criteria when making one decision or 
another about privatization; 
  --consistent curtailment of voucher privatization as a 
populist direction which is incapable of resolving the social 
justice problem but which increases the growth of inflation and 
the disorganization of industrial potential; and 
  --shifting the center of gravity from privatization of 
property to privatization of management as the most important 
condition for developing the activity of persons in a market 
economy. 
  Based on these fundamental approaches, a long-term state 
program should be worked out to change property relationships. 
It cannot be only the business of one department--the 
Goskomimushchestvo [State Committee on the Administration of 
State Property]; it should be carried out with the participation 
of all parts of the federal executive authority, subjects of the 
federation, organs of local self-government, and other nonstate 
structures--pension, insurance, and charity funds, cooperative 
associations, and religious organizations. 
  The Economics Department of the Russian Academy of Sciences 
and the International "Reforma" Fund believe that the 
realization of all these principles will make it possible to 
change the guideposts of economic reform, to expand its social 
base, to minimize the social costs, and to retain the potential 
for revitalizing Russia--the quality of the people, education, 
medicine, culture, and basic science. 
  The basic stages of the economic reform. 
Achievement of the final objectives formulated above will 
require a long period of time. For this reason, it is important 
to determine the consistency and interrelationship of the steps 
being made, to have a kind of "network schedule" of the reform. 
Clear-cut division of the stages is also socially significant 
because it makes the real, practically achievable results more 
specific for the people. 
  Three stages in realizing the new strategy for Russian 
economic reform may be singled out in consolidated form: 
  The first one, the stabilization stage, will take roughly 2 
to 3 years. A combination of measures aimed at preventing 
further impoverishment of the people and the degradation of 
society is set forth as an absolute priority here. In the 
economic sphere, the principal tasks in this stage are: 
  --stopping the recession of production and embarking on 
the path of its subsequent upsurge; 
  --singling out "breakthrough zones" which make it 
possible to break the negative tendencies and achieve visible, 
socially important results (housing construction, solution of 
food and medicine problems, and so forth); 
  --stabilization of the financial situation and gradual 
reduction of the rate of inflation, bringing it to an acceptable 
level at this stage; and 
  --maintaining the potential of revitalization and 
economic growth (scientific-technical and personnel potential, 
advanced technologies, unique research and development, and so 
forth). 
  Priorities in social and investment-structural policy, the 
principles of tax, money and credit, and currency policy, and 
consolidated indicators for the budget and the volumes of 
critical imports purchased should be determined and adopted 
(with a guarantee of their stability) in the very near future. 
  Successful implementation of tasks in the stabilization 
period will make it possible to enter the second stage--the 
stage of major structural and institutional reorganization of 
the economy. It may take about 10 years. This time will be 
required not only so that the production volume before the 
crisis can be restored, but so that structural reorganization of 
the economy can be carried out and development of the subjects 
and infrastructure of a market economy can be completed. 
  Achieving the pre-crisis volume in the GNP when the 
structure 
has been renovated should make it possible to substantially 
improve the level and quality of the people's life and to smooth 
out the unwarranted gaps between groups of the population, those 
with the highest and lowest incomes. The growth of the size and 
relative importance of the "middle class" will become one of the 
important stabilizers of the social and political situation in 
the country. 
  By the end of this period, we can count on a substantial 
decrease in Russia's dependence on foodstuffs, the active 
participation in the foreign market of products from the 
processing industry, and full and steady convertibility of the 
ruble. 
  Performance of the tasks cited will make it possible to move 
to the final stage of the reform--completion of a model for a 
socially oriented market economy which is adequate for Russia's 
conditions and inclusion among the leaders of the world economy. 
<H5>  Structural Policy in the Current Stage </H5>
  Structural policy is essentially a tool for shaping the 
intersectorial and intrasectorial proportions of production and 
the most important factor which determines the efficiency of the 
entire national economy. An effective structural policy is 
possible only when definite prerequisites are observed. They 
include: determination of clearly outlined and formulated 
structural objectives; favorable conditions for investment 
activity; and the availability of mechanisms and institutions 
for the realization of national priorities. 
  These prerequisites are practically nonexistent at present. 
In this sense there is every reason to maintain that the 
conditions were not created over the 2 years of reform for 
conducting a purposeful structural policy. The actions taken by 
the government to resolve the vast number of private problems in 
the area of production and investment activity do not exceed the 
limits of current, practical regulation of the economy. 
  At the same time, the structure of the economy is changing 
spontaneously, and a number of negative trends have taken shape 
today. They include the following: 
  --a faster production recession in the processing 
sectors which determine the level of quality of the technologies 
being used (for example, reduction of electrical engineering 
output and instrument-making products over the 2 years by 42 
percent and a cutback of 40 to 48 percent in the products of 
organic synthesis); 
  --an increase in stress on the economy's structure 
because of the increased proportion of energy raw material 
sectors; 
  --a substantial and continuing increase in the 
power-output ratio of the national economy (15 percent in 1992 
and 5 percent in 1993); 
  --an increase in the proportion of gross output of 
secondary products and reserves (it increased by over 10 
percentage points over the 2-year period); 
  --a sharp decrease in the volume of capital investments 
(by more than one-half) and, as a result, a substantial 
acceleration of the aging processes of the production machinery 
and an increase in the concealed retirement of capacities (as of 
the end of 1993, the depreciation of fixed production capital 
was assessed at 58 percent and the level of concealed retirement 
of capacities by sectors was 10 to 15 percent); and 
  --the high rate of decline in the production of popular 
food commodities which ensure quality in the diet (by 43 percent 
in the production of meat and dairy products over the 2-year 
period). 
  In the opinion of the Economics Department of the Russian 
Academy of Sciences and the International "Reforma" Fund, all 
the trends cited attest to the rapid formation of an orientation 
toward raw materials in the Russian economy and the loss of a 
significant part of its scientific and technical potential. 
  Under conditions in which a dominant role in 
inflationary processes is played by cost inflation, it is 
impossible to combat it successfully by purely moetarist 
methods. Moreover, in such a situation the 
anti-inflationary measures aimed at limiting the money supply 
and reducing the budget deficit deprive the entire national 
economy of the opportunity to make efficient structural changes 
and lead to intensification of the production recession. The 
lack of investments does not make it possible to change the 
structure of technologies and thereby stop the cost inflation. 
  Under these conditions, only after changing the relationship 
of prices to basic products and resources and making the 
structure of domestic prices more appropriate for the structure 
of costs and the structure of the technologies which we have can 
the macroeconomic prerequisites be created for savings and 
expanding investment activity, the normal functioning of 
production, and an effective structural policy. 
  Accomplishing this task by further price liberalization, 
chiefly for energy resources, when the monopoly position of the 
main commodity producers is maintained will constrict the market 
even further and lead to a new upsurge in inflation, further 
production recession, and the collapse of entire sectors. The 
economy will be pressured by a new level of prices and the price 
relationships will turn out to be inappropriate for efficient 
structural reorganization. 
  A different path is more feasible--use of the traditional 
stabilizing measures applied in many countries in similar 
situations. This means the use of state price regulation methods 
in a given stage for those commodities which increase national 
economic costs to the greatest extent. 
  At the same time, it is important to note two circumstances. 
  First. Regulation of prices is not a repetition of 
previous methods of economic operation, even if the state 
resorts to it quite extensively at present (unfortunately, not 
within the system and purposefully, often under the influence of 
the lobbying interests of individual groups, without 
coordination with budgetary, credit, and investment policy, 
separately from the dynamics of incomes). 
  Second. The method being proposed for creating 
prerequisites for a normal reproduction process is objectively 
very complicated to implement. It will inevitably require 
substantial efforts from the state, those engaged in economic 
activity, and labor collectives. But under the present 
conditions, in our view, there is no other sensible alternative 
to it. Other variations, by increasing the "price" of 
stabilization immeasurably, may end up with a complete economic 
collapse. 
  The model we propose assumes the following sequence of 
actions: 
  --prices for a limited group of raw material resources 
and railroad tariffs are fixed for a definite period of time. 
The state liquidates its indebtedness to the sectors and spheres 
of the national economy; and 
  --after that, the relationships of prices and the wage 
level are normalized by means of the conciliatory process within 
the framework of this group. 
  The problem of indexing wages in sectors subject to price 
regulation may be resolved by using special wage regulation 
funds formed either with tax receipts from above-norm 
profitability or direct budgetary subsidies. 
  According to calculations by the Institute of National 
Economic Forecasting of the Russian Academy of Sciences made on 
the basis of appropriate models, the overall rate of inflation 
as the result of such measures may be reduced to 8 to 10 percent 
per month. 
  Over this period (2 to 3 months), the prices in other 
sectors 
move closer to the normative relationships. For the producers 
selling their products at free prices, progressive taxation is 
introduced for above-norm profitability. Sanctions for evading 
the taxes are toughened. There is revaluation of fixed capital 
or indexing of amortization allotments, with tougher conditions 
for their use. Tax exemptions are introduced for part of the 
profit being used for accumulation of fixed capital. 
  As a result of all the measures being proposed, the level of 
inflation may be reduced to 3 to 5 percent per month in 4 to 5 
months. 
  Probably other methods of regulating prices and stopping 
inflation are possible as well. In the event that the concept of 
regulation itself is adopted, the scientists and specialists of 
the Economics Department of the Russian Academy of Sciences and 
the International "Reforma" Fund are prepared to take part in 
developing a mechanism for its implementation. But at the same 
time, it should be remembered that disregarding the problem of 
prices in the national economy and postponing its solution is 
fraught with very serious consequences which may turn out to be 
irreversible. Time dictates the necessity of raising this 
problem and searching for a solution without delay. 
  There is no question that the procedure for adjusting prices 
to efficient relationships is extremely complicated. It requires 
very painstaking and skillful work. When efficient price 
relationships are worked out, it is essential to bear in mind 
that the world correlations are not suitable for us now. But the 
relationships of pre-reform 1990 are not satisfactory either, 
inasmuch as they will be playing a protective role with respect 
to obsolete technologies. It appears that a balance between the 
stimulating role of price proportions and the relative financial 
prosperity of most of industry is provided by the relationships 
of prices found between the current correlations and those of 
1990. 
  So the plan is to first establish a certain efficient 
correlation of prices with the aid of a definite selection, 
including administrative measures, and then "add on" the entire 
system of economic regulators to these correlations over several 
months. In addition, the psychological factor plays an 
extraordinarily important role. A step such as this, related to 
the regulation of some prices, is a kind of signal to all 
persons in the market that the state "is taking the game to 
itself" and is prepared to deliberately and purposefully shape 
the key cost and price proportions for a definite period of time. 
  The change in price proportions being proposed and the 
availability of significant unutilized capacities in our economy 
are still not sufficient conditions for stabilizing production 
and starting the movement toward growth. In order to reach this 
goal, an entire package of measures will need to be implemented, 
including the following: 
  --support for the solvency of sectors and enterprises 
(measures such as state purchases, guarantees for credits to 
acquire products, confirmation of resources for extension of 
credit, and the like may be utilized here); 
  --alleviation of resource limitations (meaning the 
sharp increase in imported components of investments in a number 
of resource-producing sectors, as well as the increase in 
imports of certain key products such as cotton, manganese, and 
bauxites); 
  --creation of an economic environment which stimulates 
domestic production (the creation of such an environment may 
remove the resource limitations themselves to a significant 
extent in a number of cases) with the aid of financial-monetary 
and tax mechanisms and a change in the principles of 
privatization and administrative measures; and 
  --state support for large-scale investments and those 
that are under way in the extractive sectors and 
agriculture. 
  In the initial stage, the defense industry conversion 
should play a decisive role in raising the technical level and 
restoring production volumes. The conversion of VPK 
[military industrial complex] enterprises accomplished thus far, 
on one hand, has meant imposition from above to use production 
potential to turn out civilian products oriented toward the 
system of management and directive distribution of resources 
that has taken shape, and on the other hand, it has consisted of 
production reorganization from below with orientation toward the 
technological specialization which has taken shape. This 
approach has led to preservation of the economic, legal, and 
information isolation of the military industrial complex and 
specific technologies of the VPK often have not been built into 
the existing technological lines and infrastructure of civilian 
production. 
  Under current conditions, we should not speak about the 
firsthand use of of technologies available in the defense 
complex, but the conversion of economic resources concentrated 
in it. This means the human capital--highly skilled personnel 
with habits of technological discipline, the potential of NIOKR 
[scientific research and experimental design work], and the 
transportation, power engineering, and social infrastructure. 
The economic resources of the defense sectors are adequate to 
meet most of the requirements for equipment of the fuel and 
power and other civilian sectors in relatively short periods of 
time. 
  Consequently, the main objective of national conversion 
should become technical reequipment of civilian machine building 
and increasing its capacities by changing the specialization of 
defense enterprises and bringing the production machinery of the 
main sectors of the economy up to date on this basis. The 
national nature of the conversion should create the 
prerequisites so that the result of the conversion's efforts is 
not the output of isolated types of equipment, but entire 
systems of machinery. 
  National conversion measures on a large scale are needed so 
that the defense complex's potential can begin to be utilized 
properly. They should include investment programs and the credit 
and financial support necessary for respecialization on the 
basis of privatization and stockholding. Entrepreneurial 
structures--banks, exchanges, and investment funds (including 
regional ones)--should be involved in solving the problems of 
conversion. Establishment of a multichannel system for financing 
the conversion through the market's institutional infrastructure 
will make this process commercial, and thereby profitable. 
  The following problems should be resolved as the result of 
implementing the conversion measures: 
  --an increase in the scale and qualitative level of 
technology to produce civilian durable goods based on wide 
expansion of technological and commodity cooperative activity 
with the defense industry (economically independent corporations 
with a network of small subsidiary enterprises for the final 
assembly of high-tech products); 
  --an increase in the production and expansion of the 
products list of equipment which provides the technology that 
accompanies social programs, scientific and technical research, 
and the purchase of equipment for public health, the ecology, 
and development of the social infrastructure; 
  --use of the defense complex's potential to overcome 
the structural and technological crisis in civilian machine 
building; and 
  --improvement in the quality of the specialized output 
of the military industrial complex, reinforcement of its export 
base, and a substantial increase in currency receipts from the 
sale of military and other specialized equipment abroad. 
  It is necessary to return once again to the problem of 
defining the long-range goals of structural policy. 
  Before the beginning of the currrent reforms, when the 
economy was relatively stable and controllable, the main 
objectives of structural policy were as follows: 
  --expansion of the consumer sector of the economy and 
increasing the public's incentives to work and reducing the 
resource consumption of the national economy on this basis; 
  --the technological leveling of the various sectors of 
the economy to reduce the outlays of resources and improve the 
quality of the end product; 
  --reduction of the investment burden by redistributing 
capital investments in the consumer sector and increasing the 
scale at which the inefficient part of funds are withdrawn; 
and 
  --linking up defense machine building (through the 
conversion) with the tasks of structural reorganization of the 
national economy. 
  Not one of these tasks was carried out. At the same time, 
they all continue to be important, as they were before. But the 
methods of implementing them are being changed substantially 
now. The main factor is that the state is not in a position to 
carry out such large-scale tasks independently. Conditions must 
be created for the display of initiative and self-organization 
not only by enterprises under all forms of ownership, but 
financial and credit institutions, the various funds, and broad 
sections of the public itself. 
  A national socioeconomic program which would show the real 
goals and resources in increasing national welfare can be an 
important factor here. 
  Substantial financial accumulations by the public should 
become an indispensable condition in realizing this program. An 
essential and immediate step toward this is the return of those 
savings which our citizens essentially lost when prices were 
liberalized. 
  Let us stress again that solution of one of the fundamental 
problems in the reform--the problem of structural reorganization 
of the economy--has been dragged out without justification. It 
has been postponed and made more complicated by the financial 
crisis and the uncontrolled production recession. Problems of an 
extraordinary nature--the attempts to maintain production and 
technological potential--have overshadowed the strategic goals 
of the reform in the area of structural policy. 
  As a result, neither the problems of an extraordinary nature 
nor the strategic tasks of structural changes have been resolved 
favorably. Moreover, the breakdown of production potential 
creates the danger that the resources which provide the 
opportunity for extensive structural reforms may be 
irretrievably lost. 
<H5>  The Course of Agrarian Reform and Its Prospects </H5>
  In the agrarian sector of the economy, an extraordinarily 
tense situation has taken shape which cannot be assessed 
unequivocally. 
  In analyzing world and domestic experience, the Economics 
Department of the Russian Academy of Sciences and the 
International "Reforma" Fund believe that the transition from 
one system of economic operation to another requires a 
relatively long period of time, especially in agriculture. This 
transition must include a preparatory period, first of all, and 
secondly, a transition period. 
  The results of 2 years attest to the adverse effect of 
improvised solutions and dictate the necessity of working out a 
clear-cut concept for implementing agrarian reform, with the 
obligatory separation of priority and secondary tasks, federal 
and regional tasks, and immediate and long-term tasks, as well 
as the stages for their realization. Despite the numerous 
decisions made by the government, we still do not have a 
complete program for development of the agrarian sector, even 
for the next few years. 
  As a result, the agrarian reform, which had the immediate 
objective of bringing agriculture out of the crisis situation, 
has even aggravated the crisis in a number of ways. The 
consumption of mineral fertilizers has decreased by roughly 
one-half as much. All the indicators of productivity in 
livestock raising have declined. Some of the pedigreed stock 
farms have been eliminated and selection is declining in seed 
growing. The disparity in prices for agricultural and industrial 
products is becoming acute: the gap between them nearly doubled 
in 1992. Capital investments for the entire range of work in the 
APK [agroindustrial complex] declined in the 1992-1993 period by 
69 percent compared with 1991, the gross output of the complex 
declined by 21 percent, and the production of foodstuffs was 
reduced by 27 percent. 
  The periods of time for stabilization and recovery from the 
agrarian crisis are difficult to predict because of the numerous 
factors which affect the status of the agrarian sector and their 
different behavior. Recovery from it may be difficult and 
lengthy. For example, this means dealing with the many years of 
land deterioriation, the harmful ecological consequences of an 
ownerless attitude toward natural resources and the land, and 
restoration of the rural demographic potential. 
  However, the socioeconomic structure may be changed and 
disproportions in development of the agroindustrial complex 
sectors may be eliminated in shorter periods of time. 
  In the area of land reform. The Edict "On 
Regulating Land Relationships in Developing the Agrarian Reform 
in Russia" issued by the Russian Federation president on 27 
October 1993 abolished the moratoriums on disposition of lands 
for all categories of owners and thereby established better 
conditions for beginning a legal land market. However, like a 
number of other presidential edicts, it was issued before the 
development and adoption of mechanisms to implement it. 
Logically, it should have been preceded by "The Fundamentals of 
Land Legislation" as the starting point, the basic document to 
regulate land ownrship and land use. Authorization of 
transactions for the disposal of lands should have been 
accompanied by the establishment of a procedure for these 
transactions, their taxation, the methods of assessing land, and 
so forth. 
  The land banks through which all transactions involving the 
purchase and sale of land, mortgages, and so forth, have passed 
could become the ones to arrange control over the disposition of 
lands obtained as the result of transactions. 
  At present, there is no legislation at the federal level 
which regulates leasing relationships in land use. In order to 
develop leasing, the parliament has to speed up consideration 
and adoption of the draft law "On Leasing Agricultural Lands" 
which has been prepared. 
  Changing the socioeconomic structure of the 
agroindustrial complex. With regard to kolkhozes and 
sovkhozes, a more consistent but careful policy has to be 
implemented for their real reform, not their "implied" reform, 
taking into account the social consequences of these measures 
and the wishes of the agricultural workers themselves. 
  Formation of the farm system, which included about 290,000 
farms by the beginning of 1994, has become an important 
direction of state policy. 
  We must continue active support for farming, the formation 
and functioning of associations of peasant farms; partnerships; 
subsidiary private plots; cooperatives for the joint use of 
equipment; and supply and sales, credit, and other service 
cooperatives which make it possible to perform economic tasks 
more efficiently. 
  In light of the radical changes in agrarian relationships, a 
fundamentally new look at the place, role, and nature of the 
transformation of subsidiary private plots (LPKh) is needed. The 
subsidiary private plots now produce a large proportion of a 
number of types of output, and they produce most of some types 
of products. In 1991, subsidiary private plots accounted for 28 
percent of gross agricultural output; in 1992 they accounted for 
32.6 percent, and in 1993 they accounted for 36 percent 
(preliminary data). The subsidiary private plots lead the other 
sectors in the yield of agricultural crops, the amount of milk 
obtained per cow, the amount of meat obtained per head of 
livestock, and the number of animals tended. 
  In view of the substantial importance of the subsidiary 
private plots in providing food for the public, the forms and 
types of state support provided for farms should distributed for 
these plots as well, in our opinion. In the interests of 
reinforcing assistance to the subsidiary private plots through 
local organs of authority, it is expedient to set up special 
funds to support the people's farms through deductions from the 
land tax and other local taxes and fees. 
  Amateur gardening, orchard growing, and livestock raising 
also deserves more assistance. Because it is aimed at food 
self-sufficiency, this assumes special importance in crisis 
situations, in periods of sharp increases in food prices, high 
inflation, and a decline in the living standard. Over the past 2 
years (1991-1992), 9.5 million families joined the ranks of 
gardeners and orchard growers in Russia. 
  In the agrarian economy, as in the entire economy, an 
efficient combination of state regulation and market levers is 
required. When there is an overall orientation toward free 
pricing, reinforcement of state regulation for monopoly 
commodity producers is inevitable. The state cannot completely 
refuse to regulate purchase prices at present, either. 
  In the area of finance and credit, the practice of 
financial subsidies which have no special purpose has to be 
discontinued. Funds must be granted on a repayable basis, with 
specific responsibility and for specific purposes. 
  Extension of credit on favorable terms to agricultural 
enterprises has to be maintained. This is especially important 
for beginning farmers who are expanding subsidiary private 
plots, as well as for new forms of agrricultural cooperation. 
  Peasants' regional banks, in which 70 percent of the 
founding 
capital belongs to farmers and farming organizations and 
enterprises, have been established and are now functioning. They 
can grant credit at a lower rate than normal commercial banks. 
However, replenishment of the founding capital with budgetary 
funds is required for the activity of these banks to continue. 
  The establishment of credit cooperatives is one more source 
for the extension of credit to peasants. 
  Interregional problems of the agroindustrial 
complex. The great diversity of natural, climatic, and 
other conditions in Russia's territory makes it necessary to 
take them into account more completely in forming a sectorial 
production structure for the agroindustrial complex and the 
foodstuffs market. 
  It seems expedient to form transregional corporations, 
especially where there are distances between the production 
stages of an end product. Transregional economic units could 
prevent the processes of agroindustrial production 
despecialization and alleviate the acute nature of 
intersectorial problems. Joint-stock companies, where regions 
would take part as co-owners of part of the stock shares, is a 
form in which they could exist. 
  Agrarian reform involves serious problems in the social 
sphere. 
  Social amenities and the maintenance and development of the 
rural social infrastructure require large financial 
expenditures. Local budgets are not in a position to finance the 
services field completely. Without target-oriented state 
appropriations for the production infrastructure (roads, 
communications, power supply) and social infrastructure 
(hospitals and schools), the countryside cannot manage, 
especially as the system of public education, public health, and 
general and transportation services has to be fundamentally 
transformed, taking into account the changes in the rural system 
of settlement and establishment of the farm system. 
  It is essential to provide economic incentive and establish 
favorable social and living conditions for the resettlement of 
rural families from regions in the Nonchernozem Zone and Siberia 
with a labor surplus, as well as to attract demobilized 
servicemen and refugees to rural regions with a labor shortage. 
<H5>  Money and Credit, Financial, and Taxation Policy </H5>
  The money and credit, financial, and taxation policy 
conducted in Russia in the 1992-1993 period has led to 
intensification of the crisis in the economy. The 
material-physical and monetary flows took place in a chaotic 
state of critical imbalance. The disorganized division of the 
USSR's economy without any clear-cut arrangements with respect 
to money and currency immediately led to collapse of the 
monetary system. The open inflation begun in January 1992 
actually grew into hyperinflation. The payments crisis and the 
production recession begun by it, which led enterprises to the 
brink of bankruptcy, are growing in the country. 
  The average monthly rise in prices in 1993 was 20 to 25 
percent, or about 1,000 percent annually. The Russian Central 
Bank's refinancing rate exceeded 220 percent. The financial 
"stabilization," which took the form of total insolvency of 
enterprises and the state budget (the debts to enterprises of 
the agroindustrial complex, agrarian workers, budget employees, 
oil workers, coal miners, residents of the North, and so forth), 
came into sharp conflict with the requirements to maintain 
economic and social stability in the country. 
  The actual volume of the money supply throughout 1992, 
according to calculations of the Market Institute of the Russian 
Academy of Sciences, declined to 35 percent, and taking into 
account the production slump and the "shrinkage" of the domestic 
market, it declined to 45 percent of the initial level in 
January 1991. Inflation of demand was lacking until February 
1992. The rate of increase in the monetary emission that had 
been indexed was unfavorable. This predetermined an abrupt 
intensification of the production recession. From May to 
November 1992, in order to resolve the nonpayments crisis, 
saturation of the market with the money supply was increased to 
60 percent; as a consequence of this, there was a substantial 
slowdown in the recession in the fall and winter of 1992-1993. 
However, the new deflationary measures that were taken led once 
again to the point that saturation of the market with the money 
supply fell to 30 percent. This was the cause of a new payments 
crisis and a new production recession. 
  According to data from the Russian Federation Goskomstat 
[State Committee for Statistics], the overdue debts owed to 
creditors amounted to R17 trillion as of the end of 1993. 
Enterprises were brought to a halt because of nonpayments, and 
particularly because of the insolvency of the state, which could 
not count on the fulfillment of state orders. However, the 
solution of the crisis being used today, by compulsory 
introduction of turnover in bills of exchange, the bankruptcy of 
debtor enterprises, and capitalization of debts, is leading only 
to a change in the titles of the debtors, not to the elimination 
of nonpayments in the economy. 
  Restraining demand, liberalizing prices, and bringing them 
closer to world prices have not stopped the inflation. 
  Money and credit policy. Under current conditions, 
the banking system should perform a threefold task: first, 
restore the state's controllability of the economy; secondly, 
create and implement a clear-cut mechanism for long-term 
investment of funds; and thirdly, speed up the development of 
market relationships in all sectors of the economy. In our view, 
the following system of banks correspond to the objectives set 
to the greatest extent: the Central (Emission) Bank, and 
investment and commercial banks. 
  During the period of extreme crisis, it is essential to 
strengthen the direct methods of state regulation of the money 
supply. They include: 
  --direct and firsthand control of the credit 
emission; 
  --control over cash turnover; 
  --regulation of prices and incomes; and 
  --regulation of foreign trade. 
  The state should strictly supervise and stimulate the use of 
credits according to their use priorities: food, medicine, 
housing, power, transportation, the conversion. Long-term 
investments should be stimulated by granting credits at 
favorable rates, tax exemptions, and stabilization of the 
ruble's rate of exchange. 
  The government's extremely severe financial policy 
has essentially wrecked the finances of both state and nonstate 
economic units at the microlevel. 
  The payments crisis is a crisis linked primarily with the 
loss of enterprises' working and fixed capital. In order to 
prevent a total standstill of production and implement the 
decision made on the reassessment of fixed capital, the monetary 
funds of enterprises have to be indexed without delay. At the 
same time, a special program to speed up the circulation of 
money must be prepared and carried out. 
  It is important to develop and implement a system of 
measures 
to combat inflation. We can make use of deposit accounts for 
large accumulations of money, bring the debt liabilities of 
enterprises into monetary turnover at the stock market level, 
develop forms of extending credit with a security note, and 
reinforce regulation of current market conditions and their 
factors, including prices and incomes (particularly by forming 
cartels, syndicates, and so forth, which operate efficiently 
under condtions of cost inflation). 
  In order to hold back inflation, pricing processes should be 
returned to state control. Together with the measures set forth 
previously, we have to establish a system of price agreements 
between producers, trade unions, and the government. 
  This means controllable inflation at the lowest possible 
level and a continuing rise in prices which exceeds the increase 
in incomes. 
  The Economics Department of the Russian Academy of Sciences 
and the International "Reforma" Fund consider it necessary to 
reemphasize that state regulation of prices for products of the 
TEK [fuel and energy complex], monopolist enterprises, defense 
production, and transportation tariffs has to be maintained in 
the transition period when a strategic course toward the 
preferred use of free market prices is maintained. In addition, 
the state should support parity of prices for the products 
turned out by agriculture and the products which it consumes. 
  The taxation policy of the government, following 
the lead of recommendations by the International Monetary Fund 
oriented toward "forcing out" debts from states with deficit 
budgets, has been aimed at rapid reduction of this deficit. 
Subordinate to this objective, it has been purely fiscal in 
nature, with a destimulizing effect on those engaged in economic 
activity. 
  The following should be included among the priority measures 
in carrying out a new money and credit, financial, and taxation 
policy. 
  First. Resolve the problem of budgetary federalism 
and create a capable mechanism for relationships between the 
Federation and its subjects in the financial sphere. It is 
necessary to provide for an increase in the proportion of 
territories' budgets in a common consolidated budget. This means 
redistributing incomes among the budgets at different levels in 
favor of the territorial budgets and reducing centralized 
budgetary financing at the same time. 
  The federal budget's participation in financing the regions' 
economy should be limited by the financing of federal regional 
programs and the allocation of subsidies and subventions to 
regions with a relatively low level of development and extreme 
natural and climatic or ecological conditions, as well as in the 
event of emergency situations. 
  The formation of independent budgetary systems--federal, 
republic (regional), and local--is impossible without consistent 
and clear-cut differentiation of the competence of federal and 
regional organs of authority with respect to the development and 
implementation of taxation policy. The transfer of important 
rights to subjects of the Federation with respect to the 
introduction of regional and local taxes and the setting of 
their rates has to be legally formalized for this. The Federal 
Assembly (parliament) of Russia should retain the right to 
determine the methodological principles for setting them and the 
list of taxes being collected for regional and local budgets. 
The limits of rates for these taxes should also be determined at 
the federal level, but their specific level may be set by the 
territorial authorities. 
  It appears that differences in regions' level of 
development, 
as well as the priorities in structural policy, must be taken 
into account in the stage of forming the income section of the 
federal budget, and that differentiated standards must be 
established for incomes from federal taxes which remain in local 
areas. 
  Second. Reconstruction of the ruined national 
economic investment field. 
  Together with the measures cited previously, we have to 
establish a network of state, joint-stock company, and 
cooperative investment banks for this. They are called upon to 
organize all investment and financial turnover and the issuance 
of long-term loans, including on the security of property, 
leased enterprises, and the purchase and sale of stock shares. 
  Third. Supply and marketing relationships between 
enterprises must be organized. Economic ties in a market 
environment are most effective if they function primarily 
through a system of large "wholesale merchants"--syndicates. Let 
us recall that during the period of transition to the NEP [New 
Economic Policy], the syndicates formed at that time began 
quickly, in several months, to replace administrative-command 
relationships with market forms between enterprises. This idea 
was combined with the unification in one structure of 
enterprises from various sectors with strict, consistent 
technological relationships. 
  Fourth. We need a simple and clear mechanism for 
taxing incomes and capital. It seems expedient to sharply reduce 
the total number of taxes. A clear-cut boundary has to be drawn 
between federal, regional, and local taxes. Differentiated rates 
should be set for the deductions from federal taxes for regional 
budgets... 
  Fifth. We need to reinforce control in Russia's 
banking system to bring about obligatory execution by commercial 
and investment banks of the Central Bank's directive on priority 
and preferences in extending credit to regions, sectors, and 
enterprises, and observance of economic standards and normative 
periods for payment and document transactions. Strict sanctions, 
to include seizure of licenses for the right to conduct activity 
in the banking structures concerned, have to be applied for 
violations. 
<H5>  Foreign Economic Aspects of the Russian Reform </H5>
  In 1992, when the "shock" method obviously predominated in 
the government's foreign economic policy, the cutback in foreign 
trade turnover took place at an even faster pace than the 
production recession. The total volume of foreign trade turnover 
in 1992 was $76 billion, and it was reduced by 24 percent 
compared with the previous year. In 1993 the volume of foreign 
trade turnover was R76.2 billion [sic], that is, it remained at 
the level of the previous year. As a whole, this does not change 
the unfavorable trends that have taken shape in foreign trade. 
The result cited could have been assessed as favorable if it had 
not been achieved by substantially increasing the physical 
amount of commodities being exported, primarily energy 
resources, when there was a decline of 15 percent in contract 
prices for them. But the main point is that just as in 1992, the 
composition of exports and imports became substantially worse in 
1993. 
  Exports are being deindustrialized more and more because of 
the deep crisis in the processing industry, primarily in machine 
building. The composition of imports is also taking a noticeable 
turn for the worse. 
  The policy of attracting foreign investments, which could 
have had a significant effect in promoting investment activity 
in the economy if it had been successful, proved to be 
underproductive as well. According to certain data, the total 
volume of foreign investments in Russia was about R7 billion as 
of 1 July 1993. This is an extremely small amount. 
  The currency policy proved to be ineffective 
during the reforms. Accelerated introduction of ruble 
convertibility was its key component. It brought definite 
external changes into the economy, of course: the process of 
buying and selling foreign currency by both legal and physical 
persons was simplified, and experience in the currency markets 
and exchanges is being accumulated. However, the "shock" method 
of introducing domestic ruble convertibility when there is an 
inadequate economic, organizational, legal, and methodical 
foundation inevitably led to the rapid decline of the ruble's 
exchange rate. Repeated assurances by the government in 1992 to 
stabilize the ruble's exchange rate, initially at the level of 
20 to 30 rubles to the dollar and then 80 rubles, turned out to 
be incompetent and evidently were counting on International 
Monetary Fund resources to form a stabilization fund of $6 
billion, which were not obtained. In 1993, Russia came out with 
an exchange rate of more than R400 to the dollar, and it 
continued to drop, exceeding the mark of R1,500 to the dollar in 
January 1994. 
  The exchange rate of the ruble taking shape on the exchange 
became a guidepost in many respects in setting domestic prices, 
thereby promoting a surge in inflation, strengthening the 
dollar's position in the economy, and cultivating insecurity in 
the public consciousness about the national currency and 
avoidance of it. In perspective, if the government's currency 
policy is not revised, all these harmful consequences for the 
economy will not only be retained, but intensified. 
  And finally, in assessing the foreign economic aspects of 
the 
Russian reform, we cannot limit this sphere to distant foreign 
countries. 
  After the collapse of the USSR, the countries of the 
near abroad are now Russia's main foreign market, with a 
concentration of about 60 percent of its total foreign trade 
turnover. And it is very important that this is a market where 
its products are competitive. However, this is a more unstable 
and less regulated market in which pricing, payment and 
settlement, and other instruments for its regulation still 
differ from those accepted in world practice. 
  As a result, there is a continuing cutback in mutual ties, 
which is one of the main reasons for the production recession in 
every one of the new states without exception. Commodity 
exchange within just the CIS declined by nearly one-half in 1992 
compared with the previous year. This trend continued in 1993. A 
threatening, shortsighted reorientation of Russian exports from 
countries of the near abroad to more distant countries is under 
way. This is shown particularly clearly in the changing 
geography of energy resource exports. 


----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Exports of Russian Energy Resources to the Near Abroad and More Distant Co-| 
|untries (Over 11 Months)                                                   | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |Total Exports     |Increase (+) or Decrease (-) in Expo-| 
|                  |                  |rts Compared With Same period in 1992| 
|                  |                  |, in Percent                         | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                  |                  |To the Near Abroad|To More Distant C-| 
|                  |                  |                  |ountries          | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Oil, in millions  |117.1             |-38               |+24.3             | 
|of metric tons    |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Gas, in billions  |155.7             |-72.6             |+4.3*             | 
|of cubic meters   |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Coal, in millions |24.3              |-54.7             |+7.4              | 
|of metric tons    |                  |                  |                  | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|*Without the transit of Turkmen gas.                                       | 
----------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Similar processes are being observed in the export policy of 
other CIS countries, especially Turkmenistan, Kazakhstan, 
Uzbekistan, Ukraine, and Belarus, which may turn into heavy 
losses of markets for Russian industry, primarily its processing 
sectors. 
  There is no alternative but to reintegrate the economy of 
the 
CIS countries, in our view. This is in Russia's interests, as 
well as those of the CIS countries. Recognition of this 
objective necessity was expressed in the CIS countries' 
declaration on establishment of the Economic Union. However, the 
extensive political activity displayed in this direction will 
not have real economic results unless a realistic and balanced 
program of practical actions is placed under this document. 
There is no such program at present... Primary attention in 
drafting it should be devoted to solution of the following 
questions, in our view. 
  First. Substantiation for a model of an open 
economy as applied to the specific characteristics of 
Russia and its new geopolitical position, and most importantly, 
determination of the strategy and tactics for reaching the goal 
set by stages. The question of developing the process of the 
"openness" of Russia's economy by stages is important and 
fundamental. 
  "Shock" methods, as well as attempts to restore strict 
administrative measures, applied under the influence of 
transitory interests, should be excluded in all stages in actual 
policy. At the same time, and this is important to stress, 
foreign economic policy should have its own constant social 
component in all the stages. 
  Second. The question of openness and economic 
security. 
  Under the new market conditions, this question is much more 
complicated and covers a much broader scale than before. 
Obviously the objective now is to protect (insure) Russia's 
entire reproductive mechanism from possible unfavorable 
influences of world market conditions and to ensure that 
activity in the Russian market by domestic and foreign economic 
entities conforms to overall state interests. 
  Third. A key question in foreign economic policy has 
been and continues to be the development of exports and 
reinforcement of their foundation. 
  In the strategic plan, export policy should be aimed at 
selling commodities in the foreign market when the country has 
international advantages, at bringing out domestic enterprises 
for competition with foreign firms, and at increasing the series 
production (scale) of domestic output in order to "push it out" 
into foreign markets. It is obvious, however, that selection of 
a future "export basket" and the industrialization of exports 
cannot proceed spontaneously. 
  It is equally important that we not postpone creation of a 
modern mechanism of state support for exports--export credits, 
guarantees, risk insurance, and incentive for Russian 
investments abroad (including those based on the sale of debt 
assets), which will be able to form a basis for the country's 
participation in international production and the infrastructure 
to move domestic products into foreign markets. 
  On a practical level, it is necessary to further liberalize 
exports, minimize the application of quotas and licenses, and 
greatly simplify the licensing procedure. This is especially 
important for those commodities which are not sold in a reduced 
domestic market. In the near future we must sharply limit the 
fiscal function of exports (export duties) which is totally 
inappropriate for them, and later on, to the extent that there 
is a change in the level and structure of domestic prices, it 
should be completely eliminated. 
  Finally, it is essential to put the exports themselves in 
order organizationally and eliminate the elements of 
unprofessionalism, anarchy, and competition between Russian 
firms. 
  Fourth. The import policy needs to be fundamentally 
revised. 
  At the strategic level, import policy should be aimed at 
supplying the country with products which provide technical and 
economic advantages over domestic products, which modernize the 
production potential, which enrich the supply of consumer goods 
in the domestic market, and which supply us with products which 
are not turned out in the country. 
  For the purpose of stabilization, it appears to be 
absolutely 
necessary to maintain critical centralized imports for state 
needs (medicines, food, and complete units) for the near future. 
<H5>  [5 Feb p 3] </H5>
  [Text] The main practical task is to create a system of 
import tariff regulation that has been reasoned out thoroughly 
which performs a threefold function: optimization of imports, 
regulation of competition, and provision for budgetary 
interests. For this the government needs to be absolutely clear 
about which vitally important sectors of the economy must be 
protected, which areas of foreign competition should be 
regulated, and where it should be completely open to stimulate 
the competitiveness of domestic production. 
  Fifth. The nucleus of the new currency policy has been 
and continues to be achievement of real ruble 
convertibility. 
  In principle, the accomplishment of this task cannot lead to 
any objections or doubts. But it cannot and should not be done 
separately, but on the basis of stabilization of the economy and 
the state's finances and balance of payments--not all at once, 
but in stages. For this reason, in recognizing that the course 
toward achievement of real ruble convertibility is strategic, we 
believe that in the period under review the problem does not 
mean artificially accelerating this process, but putting in 
order the system of domestic ruble convertibility, which is now 
being speeded up, as a stage in the transition to its real 
convertibility. 
  Exchange rate formation and the establishment of efficient 
currency relationships between the state and juridical and 
physical persons is the central problem here. We are proceeding 
from the conviction that there can be no direct return to the 
currency monopoly of the past and artificial isolation of the 
ruble's exchange rate from the market. However, it is absolutely 
essential to limit the destructive effects of stock exchange 
speculations on the exchange rate and to put the mechanism for 
setting the exchange rate in good order. On a practical level, 
the following alternatives for a solution may be considered here. 
  The essence of the first alternative is to introduce 100 
percent of the compulsory sale of currency earnings in the 
market. This is an old idea, but it will not produce the desired 
effect under current conditions. 
  The essence of the second alternative, which we consider 
preferable in this stage, is to temporarily refuse to recognize 
the stock exchange's rate of exchange for the ruble as the 
official rate. The Central Bank of the Russian Federation could 
determine the official rate of exchange in the indicators of the 
actual price proportions of Russian exports and imports and use 
this as the accounting rate in all areas covered by state 
currency regulation: in calculating taxes, customs duties and 
fees, in determining the ruble cost of centralized imports, in 
evaluating fixed capital and foreign investments, and finally, 
in reflecting the foreign currency which banks and enterprises 
report in their accounts and the participation by foreigners in 
privatization. Such an official exchange rate could be adjusted 
regularly, depending on the exchange rates of foreign currencies 
being held, to which it would be expedient to attach the 
dynamics of domestic prices for goods and services as well. 
  Real support for the official exchange rate and expansion of 
stock exchange trade in currency would be a change in the 
current system of currency centralization, namely substitution 
of the compulsory sale of 50 percent of export earnings by a 
currency tax of 15 to 20 percent on it, leaving the remaining 
currency at the exporters' disposal. 
  In perspective, both exchange rates will draw together to 
the 
extent that an authentic currency market is developed, and 
conditions will thereby appear for the use of a single, real 
market rate of exchange officially quoted by the TsBR [Central 
Bank of Russia] and the shift to a system of 100 percent 
currency sales. 
  The version being proposed removes or limits all the harmful 
consequences of the "convertibility" analyzed above. 
  Sixth. The policy of attracting foreign investments 
requires drastic revision. 
  The accent here should be on attracting private foreign 
investments as one of the strategic directions of Russia's 
foreign economic policy in the foreseeable future. Foreign 
private capital brings in advanced technology and modern 
management, it expands the capital accumulation, and it 
contributes to development of the export base and import 
replacement without increasing the state's foreign debt in the 
process, which is extremely important under current conditions. 
  Seventh. Questions of foreign indebtedness and the use 
of Russia's foreign debt assets. 
  The accumulated foreign debt weighs heavily on Russia's 
foreign economic relations. However, the specific nature of 
Russia is that it is a major international creditor at the same 
time. It is highly unlikely that both of these debts can be 
settled by traditional methods. It has become necessary to adopt 
nonstandard forms of settling the country's liabilities and 
realizing its debt assets. Taking world practice into account, 
this problem may be resolved in the following ways: 
  --repayment of the debt by payment of coordinated 
compensation with a discount from the nominal amount; 
  --conversion of the debts into investments in its 
economy or the debtor's economy; 
  --the sale of debt assets (liabilities) in a secondary 
market; and 
  --reciprocal credit for liabilities. The possibility of 
large-scale reciprocal credit for Russia's debt liabilities and 
assets may be considered with the participation of the 
International Monetary Fund and the Paris and London clubs. 
  Eighth. The problem of relationships between the 
Federation and the regions in foreign economic matters is a sore 
point. There are still quite a number of areas in dispute 
here. The most important way to put this entire system in good 
order, first of all, is by simplifying its centralized 
regulation as sensibly as possible and freeing it of unnecessary 
red tape, which would automatically remove the question of 
shifting a number of farfetched regulatory functions to subjects 
of the Federation. 
  At the structural level, when there is a unified foreign 
economic policy the Federation's subjects could have the 
opportunity at their level to choose a sound export-import 
specialization for a region, develop a foreign economic 
infrastructure, and attract foreign investments, providing 
investors with local benefits within the limits of their 
competence. Together with this, Federation subjects should have 
their own marketable commodities to export for regional needs, 
their own currency reserves, including those for social 
purposes, and receive a definite share of the federal income 
from foreign trade originating in their territory. 
  Ninth. The course toward reintegration of the former 
union republics and formation of an Economic Union of the CIS 
countries, over the long term and from the standpoint of 
Russia's state interests, is most important and a top 
priority. Any other approach deprives Russia of initiative 
and authority in the reintegration process. At the same time, a 
CIS Economic Union canot be decreed or introduced through "shock 
therapy" by relying on the other countries' dependence on 
Russia. Its establishment can only be a voluntary process, with 
its own stages, and possibly its ebbs and flows. 
  Solution of the question of the CIS countries' settlement 
and 
payment relationships is most important among the urgent 
practical tasks. All the attempts (or their semblance) to form 
ruble zones of various types have failed. There is little hope 
that the different attachments to the Russian ruble by one or 
two states will be effective. In the current stage, a realistic 
and reliable path is to form a payments union of CIS countries 
on a multicurrency basis, based on the national currencies of 
the CIS states. 
  Immediate solution of the following matters is required for 
this: 
  --the principles and procedure for coordinating the 
exchange rates of national currencies; 
  --the procedure for equalizing the balancing of 
accounts between the countries' banks; and 
  --reciprocal convertibility of national currencies and 
the use of one of them (the ruble) as a collective payment and 
reserve capital. 
  A matter of no less importance is the presence of a stage 
preceding a complete payments union, namely a clearing union, 
whose operations should be entrusted to the Interstate Bank of 
the CIS which has been established. 
<H5>  The Restoration of Controllability of the Economy </H5>
  The almost complete loss of the economy's controllability 
has 
become an extraordinarily dangerous aspect of the current 
situation. The country has entered a deepening management 
crisis--there is practically no state structure remaining which 
has not lost its authority and been deprived of real levers of 
influence on the processes taking place in the economy. 
  It is a paradoxical fact that loss of the economy's 
controllability is taking place against the background of a 
sharp increase in the size of the management apparatus and an 
increase in bureaucracy in the process of preparing and making 
decisions. Corruption in government structures is intensifying 
rapidly. It is impossible not to see that paralysis of the 
management system is a result of the effect of both objective 
and subjective factors. 
  First of all, the primarily monetarist approach to the 
reforms gives rise to the illusion that everything is formed by 
itself to the extent that the economy is liberalized. An 
arrangement is being put into practice whereby self-regulation 
of the economy, which is being achieved on the basis of 
accelerated and widespread privatization, is to take the state 
out of management. 
  Secondly, obvious oversimplification of the tasks of 
managing 
Russia's most complicated production and scientific and 
technical potential is being permitted everywhere, inasmuch as 
the solution of all the problems in efficient economic operation 
is being erroneously linked only with shareholding and the shift 
to a different form of ownership. 
  Thirdly, disruptions in providing for executive performance, 
responsibility, and supervision in the management mechanism are 
directly linked with the fact that coordination of the reforms 
and many decisions is lacking because of the federal state 
system, the sovereignty of the republics, and the independence 
of the regions, and a clear-cut division of rights and 
responsibilities between the Federation and its subjects has not 
been worked out. 
  Continuation of such a system makes the development of any 
programs to extend the reforms, which are doomed to failure in 
advance, simply meaningless. Not one of the tasks to bring the 
country out of the crisis and continue the reforms 
constructively can be performed without overcoming the 
organizational confusion and rectifying the defects and disorder 
in the management mechanism without delay. The vacuum of 
authority which has taken shape should be completely filled by 
rehabilitating the principles of state regulation and by 
substantially increasing the level of controllability of the 
economy. 
  In this connection, top priority should be given to 
regulating the procedure for the use of federal property. 
This means clear-cut definition of the limits of the state 
sector of the economy, the division of Russian state property 
and the rights to dispose of it between the Federation and its 
subjects. The immediate tasks in this area should be: 
  --direct control of state enterprises not subject to 
privatization; 
  --development of the procedure for reorganizing and 
respecializing the enterprises being privatized and state 
supervision of this process; definition of the procedure for 
assigning managers and implementation of personnel policy; 
  --effective participation by representatives of local 
organs of control in the management of joint-stock companies, 
holding companies, and financial and industrial groups; and 
  --organization of the entire process of reforming state 
enterprises, including assisting enterprises to adapt to the 
market environment. 
  At the same time, the management and disposal of 
federally-owned facilities should be retained by the Russian 
Federation Government, which can delegate a number of powers to 
ministries and departments, as well as to the organs of 
executive authority of Federation subjects. 
  We cannot continue to resign ourselves to the fact that 
ministries and departments have essentially been taken out of 
the processes of reshaping enterprises, their privatization, 
formation of the vitally important market infrastructure, and 
influence on the consumer market. The role of the state should 
be to assist in the development of financial, legal, 
engineering, and consulting services, dissemination of 
information science, training personnel, and other aspects of 
infrastructure activity. 
  It is exceptionally important to provide for a link between 
enterprises' privatization programs and the goals for structural 
reorganization of the economy and financial stabilization, 
taking into account the specific nature of the sectors and by 
providing state benefits to the privatized enterprises in 
conformity with a selective structural policy. Finally, it is 
time to realize that privatization cannot be an end in itself or 
dominate over other directions of reform. 
  Widespread shareholding of enterprises taken separately and 
the abolition of large associations--concerns, economic 
associations, and consortiums--because of this raises the 
urgent question of the orgnaizational and legal forms of 
maintaining production and scientific and technical 
potential with the technical, economic, and other ties that 
have been established. 
  The imaginary struggle against monopolism is now being 
expressed in the forced fragmentation and elimination of major 
production and economic complexes, without which, as world 
experience shows, it is impossible to implement modern 
investment programs and make fundamental changes in scientific 
and technical development. 
  In particular, we see the solution now in the formation of 
financial-industrial groups, economic associations, and 
consortiums with the initiative and leading role of the state. A 
special role should be played by holding companies whose assets 
include controlling blocks of stock in other enterprises. 
  A key role in increasing the level of controllability 
is played by coordination and stability in the distribution of 
powers between the Federation and its subjects. It is 
fundamentally important to actually transfer the powers set 
forth in the Russian Federation Constitution to the regions. 
  From top to bottom through the entire hierarchy, it is 
important to reinforce units of the executive authority in areas 
such as employment, migration, antimonopoly policy, tax 
collection, and management of state property. In the interests 
of increasing the level of controllability and expeditious 
solution of current socioeconomic problems, it is expedient for 
the regions to have representations attached to the government. 
  So the analysis of the current economic situation in Russia 
conducted by the Department of Economics of the Russian Academy 
of Sciences and the International "Reforma" Fund shows that the 
market reforms did not produce the changes desired over the 
2-year period. This was not the result of individual errors and 
miscalculations, but a course which was chosen erroneously from 
the beginning to create a liberal market economy by "shock" and 
monetarist methods. The economy is in a critical state. The 
social base of the reform being conducted has been sharply 
reduced. Continuation of the course chosen will lead the country 
to a dead end. For this reason, we reiterate that this is not a 
matter of adjusting the course that has been chosen, but of 
working out new approaches to the strategy and tactics of 
socioeconomic reforms in Russia. We have proposed a conceptual 
view of them. 
<H5>  [8 Feb p 3] </H5>
  [Text] The economic reforms being conducted, as well 
as the actual steps by the government in this direction, attest 
to the absence of a specific concept of social orientation in 
the reform. It is being carried out not only without the use of 
the social shock absorbers needed in the situation that has 
taken shape, but without a forecast of the social consequences 
beforehand. 
  As a result, the adverse trends observed in the social 
sphere in the past have been intensified noticeably since the 
beginning of the reform, becoming very detrimental in 
nature. 
  The natural reproduction of the population is characterized 
by an intensive increase in the mortality rate and a decline in 
life expectancy. This indicator, which is one of the integral 
indicators of social processes, began to drop sharply in the 
early 1990's: it was 67.5 years in 1980, 69.2 in 1990, 69.0 in 
1991, 67.9 in 1992, and 66.0 years in 1993. Judging by this 
indicator, the society appeared to have been set back 15 to 20 
years, that is, to the beginning of the 1970's, and the 
principal factor in this process has been the steadily rising 
mortality rate of the people in all age groups. 
  The unfavorable age structure of the population from the 
standpoint of marriage and the birth rate, as well as deferred 
births because of the difficult socioeconomic situation, has led 
to a decline in the birth rate that is unprecedentedly low for 
Russia and a sharp decrease in the total number of births. The 
effect of depopulation has increased (since the end of 1991), 
expressed in the natural decrease in the country's population 
which is not covered by the increase in migration. While in 1991 
Russia had a population of 148.5 million, there were 148.3 
million permanent residents as of the end of 1992 and 147.9 
million in 1993. The natural loss was 219,000 persons in 1992, 
but 806,000 in 1993, that is, over three times as many. 
  The scale of the increase in the mortality rate, especially 
for reasons of a direct social nature, is creating justifiable 
concern. With stabilization (and even some decline) in Russia's 
population, 1.653 million persons died in 1990, 1.69 million in 
1991, 1.807 million in 1992, and 2.16 million died in 1993. The 
proportion of the total number of deaths from "unnatural" causes 
after 1990 rose from 12 to 15 percent. 
  A rapid increase in the mortality rate resulted from the 
increase in alcoholism, nervous stress, suicides, and murders 
due to crime. In 1993 alone, 10 times as many persons died from 
alcoholic poisoning, murders and suicides than during the 11 
years of war in Afghanistan. Unnatural causes led to the death 
of every third person of able-bodied age. The scale of the 
mortality rate from these causes is an indisputable indicator of 
the society's ill social health. 
  One of the important reasons for the negative changes in the 
dynamics of the mortality rate is the unfavorable ecological 
situation. In 1993, the content of pollutants in the atmosphere 
in 20 Russian cities was 10 times or more above the norm. 
Extremely high pollution of reservoirs (exceeding the maximum 
permissible norms by 100 or more times) has been observed in 
Sverdlovsk, Perm, Chelyabinsk, Murmansk, Orenburg, Kemerovo, and 
Kaliningrad oblasts. According to available estimates, 15 to 20 
percent of the premature mortality is the result of chronic 
illnesses caused by environmental pollution now. 
  The centripetal migration flows into Russia from former 
republics of the USSR have intensified sharply. The most 
critical socio-demographic problem is the problem of refugees 
and those who have been forced to resettle, looking for 
asylum in Russia because ethnic conflicts have intensified in 
places where they used to live. Over the past 4 years, the 
number of Russian-speaking refugees has reached 2.4 million, and 
2 million persons have been forced to resettle in Russia. 
  As of 1 September 1993, 352,600 refugees and persons forced 
to resettle were registered in Russia, which is 6.1 times as 
many as in September 1992. This means an increase in the rate of 
resettlement, and the overall potential for migration in the 
next 2 to 3 years (until 1995) is estimated at 4 million to 5 
million persons. The significant scale of unregulated migrant 
flows is making it difficult to provide the population with 
food, housing, and services, and exacerbating the unemployment 
problem. 
  The process of increasing unemployment is continuing in 
the country. Official figures in Russia as a whole have not 
exceeded 1 percent of the active population, although it is 7 to 
11 percent in individual regions. Hidden unemployment, in the 
form of part-time employment and compulsory unpaid leaves, is 
typical. In the first 6 months of 1993, over 4 million persons, 
including 3 million on compulsory leaves without pay, were 
working part-time. It is estimated that 7,000 to 9,000 persons, 
or 8 to 11 percent of the able-bodied population, are in the 
hidden employment category. The growth of unemployment is 
continuing in a stagnant form. The proportion of persons forced 
to be unemployed for more than 4 months was 8 percent at the end 
of 1992, but 52 percent of the total number of unemployed at the 
end of 1993. 
  The labor safety situation is getting worse. About 30 
persons 
are killed and more than 50 are crippled in production every 
day. There are about 400,000 accidents each year at enterprises. 
The level of industrial injuries is two to four times higher 
than the corresponding indicators in the developed countries of 
Europe. 
  The increase in inflation and poor wage protection have led 
to the point that the wage per employee in late 1993 (October) 
was only one-third of what it was in December 1991 (in 
comparable prices). A similar picture is typical for the 
dynamics of the public's per capita monetary incomes. 
  The situation with respect to a minimum pension is even 
worse. In October 1993, it was only one-fourth of the minimum in 
December 1991. The trends in the dynamics of basic allowances 
for children are similar. Their correlation with average per 
capita income in mid-1993 dropped by more than one-third (3.3 to 
3.7). 
  Today's standard for consumption of food products for most 
middle-income families is at the level typical for the late 
1960's and early 1970's. According to estimates, the level of 
meat and meat product consumption was 77 percent of the 1975 
level, the level of milk and dairy product consumption was 72 
percent of the 1975 level, and the level of consumption of fish 
and fish products was 75 percent of that level in 1993. While 
the proportion of expenses for food in a family's total 
expenditures was about 30 percent in 1990, it has climbed to 60 
to 70 percent on average today. For one-third of the population 
who are living on the threshold of poverty, this proportion has 
reached 90 percent of consumer expenses and it has deprived them 
of the opportunity to meet even the most basic needs for 
clothing or to obtain the simplest items and household articles. 
In the subsistence minimum of pensioners, food makes up 83 
percent and nonfood items, mainly essential items for health, 
hygiene, and medicines, make up only 10 percent. Most disabled 
persons can obtain only bread, groats, and macaroni products. 
But there is a sizable number of pensioners (13 to 16 percent) 
who find it very difficult to obtain even bread and groats. If 
their situation is not changed, we can expect an increase in the 
mortality rate of this group. 
  While most of the population seems to have been thrown back 
20 years as far as current consumption is concerned, a small 
group of families (about 10 percent) have seen their incomes 
increase. According to official data, the correlation of the 
average income of 10 percent of the richest and 10 percent of 
the poorest changed as follows: it was 5.4 times in 1991, 7.2 
times in June 1992, 9.0 in June 1993, and 10.4 times in December 
1993. 
  According to estimates of the Institute of Socioeconomic 
Problems of the Russian Academy of Sciences, the proportion of 
poor persons (with an income below the subsistence minimum) is 
35 percent, but the proportion of destitute persons (with an 
income below half of the subsistence minimum) is 7 to 10 percent. 
  We cannot help but note a number of factors related to 
the misinformation given to the government and the people about 
the sociodemographic situation that has taken shape. 
  This primarily concerns the dynamics of real wages and real 
incomes. The Center for Market Conditions attached to the 
Russian Federation Government maintains that the population's 
real incomes are increasing. In this case, a number of methods 
are used, one of which is to neglect all the preceding periods 
and compare all the subsequent periods with January 1992, which 
was the month when wages dropped by one-third and per capita 
income was one-fourth of the previous level. 
  Another method, with which they attempt to show the increase 
in people's incomes in comparison with 1991, is based on use of 
the speculative and constantly changing exchange rate of the 
dollar. 
  The process of society's stratification is 
characterized by extremely unfavorable manifestations: 
  --the extreme intensiveness at which it is proceeding, 
which in itself is a negative factor which affects social 
processes and leads to social and psychological stress; 
  --the proportion of impoverished persons and marginal 
strata is increasing and the proportion of rich persons remains 
relatively stable, but the extent of their wealth is increasing, 
which aggravates the conflict between the poles; 
  --there is a common tendency of income polarization in 
the wages of socially skilled groups of employees, "washing 
away" the intermediate groups; and 
  --income gaps are formed mainly as the result of more 
poverty and pauperization of a relatively broad sector of the 
population. 
  Measures of social support implemented during the reform 
years do not represent a unified, well-considered system. 
Payments from the state budget are consistently late. First of 
all, wage payments are periodically delayed considerably, and 
this in itself is a violation of a person's rights; secondly, 
social security organs are not able to review the pensions every 
quarter; and thirdly, under the worsening crisis conditions, the 
state has proved to be unable to support a guaranteed level of 
earnings and pensions in conformity with the changing minimum 
consumer basket. The indexing of minimum earnings and pensions 
repeatedly promised to the people following the dynamics of the 
subsistence minimum has not been carried out. 
  The conclusion may be drawn that we are on the threshold of 
the social assistance system's breakdown as a social institution. 
  In practically all fields of vital activity, there is 
intensified discrimination against women. 
  The basis for this discrimination is the noncompetitiveness 
of the female work force in the labor market, since they are 
burdened with difficult social factors associated with their 
maternal functions. 
  So the conclusion may be drawn that the crisis has covered 
all areas of the public's life. The historic pattern of public 
consumption, with its own trends and traditions, has been 
broken. The effort to liberalize the social sphere has led to 
its degradation, and the introduction of liberal relationships 
in the distribution sphere has resulted in its complete 
breakdown as a system. 
  There has been and continues to be one solution--a socially 
oriented economy, that is, market relationships with definite 
limiters of a social nature. The basic principles of such 
limitations during the course of the reform may be formulated as 
generalized postulates. 
  First. The basic principle in developing a system of 
distributive relationships is reliable state regulation of the 
subsistence minimum, both from the standpoint of the 
methodology of its definition and the position of monitoring its 
changes under the influence of inflation. 
  Second. The state seeks to create the conditions to 
provide real opportunities for all able-bodied citizens to 
realize their right to a worthy life, guaranteeing protection of 
other rights and freedoms at the same time. 
  Third. The state provides for regulation of excessively 
high incomes through progressive taxation in order to 
prevent the trend of economic inequality from growing in society 
and destabilization of social conditions. 
  Based on what has been stated, the Economics Department of 
the Russian Academy of Scinece and the International "Reforma" 
Fund propose the following basic directions for social policy 
and the stages of their implementation. 
  First of all, it is essential to liquidate all the debts of 
state and nonstate enterprises which are related either to late 
payment of earnings or a payment below the legally established 
level. A repetitive fine for violating constitutional and labor 
laws in this field should be specified. This measure should be 
implemented in the first half of 1994. 
  Establishment of the subsistence minimum in a 
legislative procedure, defining clear-cut rules for its 
calculation, its changes in time, and applied to individual 
regions of the country, should be put into effect no later than 
the first half of 1994. 
  Movement of the minimum wage and social payments in stages 
closer to the subsistence minimum should be completed no later 
than the first half of 1995. 
  Implementation of housing reform by stages, including 
the provision of a minimum level of housing for all Russian 
citizens at the state's expense, presupposes: 
  --establishment at the federal level of minimum 
acceptable housing conditions (separately for urban and rural 
areas), below which regional authorities may not set their 
standards in the distribution of municipal housing; 
  --development of a system of privatizing available 
state housing to the extent that applications are received from 
citizens living in available state housing; 
  --expansion of the building of private housing through 
the provision of loans at favorable rates, the land, the 
materials needed, establishment of a mortgage mechanism, and the 
introduction and extensive use of provincial loans used to build 
and purchase housing; and 
  --rationalization of the taxation of middleman 
operations in the purchase and sale of housing; and the 
channeling of funds from such special-purpose taxes into housing 
construction for the dependents of society. 
  The legislative formalization of the appropriate standards 
should be put into effect in 1994. 
  The implementation of pension reform with the aim 
of establishing a three-level pension coverage: a social pension 
paid by the state budget, which is provided to all citizens of a 
specific age, regardless of their length of service, as well as 
to members of society who are not able-bodied; a labor pension 
from professional funds formed with deductions from enterprises 
with all forms of ownership; and an individual pension based on 
the creation of nonstate pension funds, in which mostly private 
savings are accumulated. 
  Reinforcement of the system of social benefits for 
all groups and sectors of the population which are not in a 
position to provide for themselves for objective reasons: the 
unemployed (specific periods of time), ill persons, the 
disabled, single mothers, large families with small children, 
and refugees. 
  An urgent measure that has to be implemented no later than 
the first half of 1994 is to establish a system of food 
assistance for those categories of people who are especially 
vulnerable and to expand the network of free dining rooms for 
them. 
  A system of multipurpose loans has to be developed for 
youths (16 to 25 years old) and young families: to acquire 
a vocation and improve skill, to obtain housing, and to provide 
themselves with property. 
  Reorganization of the public health system by 
stages in order to increase the effectiveness and quality of its 
service. Free medical attention at the level set by the state 
should be provided for all groups and sections of the public. 
Development of paid forms of health care should take place 
together with the free state assistance, but not in place of it 
and not on its basis. 
  Along with the measures to take effect over the long term, 
emergency solution of the most critical problems in the areas of 
sanitary and epidemiological insection, primary medical and 
emergency aid, and guaranteed provision of basic medicines for 
the public are needed in 1994. It is advisable to set up a 
special state fund to purchase the most essential medicines and 
medical equipment and to maintain the required level of sanitary 
engineering support for cities. 
  Social policy should provide for the basic types of 
education free of charge: general, secondary, and higher 
education, by financing from the state budget. Development of 
the different forms of paid education at all levels should take 
place together with this with the apporopriate supervision of 
the state and without detriment to the free education. 
  In order to increase the effectiveness and quality of free 
general education, a system of local public-state trustee 
councils has to be established to provide the supervision and 
patronage needed. 
  The unemployment problem requires special 
attention. We have to strengthen measures to provide full 
protection for those who are partly unemployed. The government 
should establish and be guided by an acceptable level of 
unemployment. This indicator should serve as a strict social 
limitation. We have to form a system to provide an acceptable 
level of employment in regions where unemployment is especially 
high and stagnant. 
  The main orientation of state actions in the field of 
employment should be preventive and warning in nature to stave 
off mass unemployment, as well as to expand opportunities for 
the employment of socially vulnerable strata of the population 
under the conditions of intensified competition in the labor 
market. 

